California, session 20252026, AB1672.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14301.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14301.1. (a) For rates established on or after August 1, 2007, the department shall pay capitation rates to health plans participating in the Medi-Cal managed care program using actuarial methods and may establish health-plan- and county-specific rates. Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall apply to any managed care organization, licensed under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), that has contracted with the department as a primary care case management plan pursuant to Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088) of Chapter 7 to provide services to beneficiaries who are HIV positive or who have been diagnosed with AIDS for rates established on or after July 1, 2012. The department shall utilize a county- and model-specific rate methodology to develop Medi-Cal managed care capitation rates for contracts entered into between the department and any entity pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), and Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of Chapter 7 that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Health-plan-specific encounter and claims data.(2) Supplemental utilization and cost data submitted by the health plans.(3) Fee-for-service data for the underlying county of operation or other appropriate counties as deemed necessary by the department.(4) Department of Managed Health Care financial statement data specific to Medi-Cal operations.(5) Other demographic factors, such as age, gender, or diagnostic-based risk adjustments, as the department deems appropriate.(b) To the extent that the department is unable to obtain sufficient actual plan data, it may substitute plan model, similar plan, or county-specific fee-for-service data.(c) The department shall develop rates that include administrative costs, and may apply different administrative costs with respect to separate aid code groups.(d) The department shall develop rates that shall include, but are not limited to, assumptions for underwriting, return on investment, risk, contingencies, changes in policy, and a detailed review of health plan financial statements to validate and reconcile costs for use in developing rates.(e) The department may develop rates that pay plans based on performance incentives, including quality indicators, access to care, and data submission.(f) The department may develop and adopt condition-specific payment rates for health conditions, including, but not limited to, childbirth delivery.(g) (1) Before finalizing Medi-Cal managed care capitation rates, the department shall provide health plans with information on how the rates were developed, including rate sheets for that specific health plan, and provide the plans with the opportunity to provide additional supplemental information.(2) For contracts entered into between the department and any entity pursuant to Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) of Chapter 7, the department, by June 30 of each year, or, if the budget has not passed by that date, no later than five working days after the budget is signed, shall provide preliminary rates for the upcoming fiscal year.(h) For the purposes of developing capitation rates through implementation of this ratesetting methodology, Medi-Cal managed care health plans shall provide the department with financial and utilization data in a form and substance as deemed necessary by the department to establish rates. These data shall be considered proprietary and shall be exempt from disclosure as official information pursuant to Section 7927.705 of the Government Code as contained in the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(i) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the department may apply this section to the capitation rates it pays under any managed care health plan contract.(j) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may set and implement managed care capitation rates, and interpret or make specific this section and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.(k) (1) The department shall report, upon request, to the fiscal and policy committees of the respective houses of the Legislature regarding implementation of this section.(2) The department shall publish on its public internet website a description of the rate methodology, data used for rate development, and core actuarial assumptions and adjustments in each year that the department develops rates pursuant to this section.(l) Before October 1, 2011, the risk-adjusted countywide capitation rate shall comprise no more than 20 percent of the total capitation rate paid to each Medi-Cal managed care plan.(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve the policy goal to support and strengthen traditional safety net providers who treat high volumes of uninsured and Medi-Cal patients when Medi-Cal enrollees are defaulted into Medi-Cal managed care plans.(2) As the department adds additional factors, such as managed care plan costs, to the Medi-Cal managed care plan default assignment algorithm, it shall consult with the Auto Assignment Performance Incentive Program stakeholder workgroup to develop cost factor disregards related to intergovernmental transfers and required wraparound payments that support safety net providers.(n) (1) The department shall develop and pay capitation rates to entities contracted pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), using actuarial methods and in a manner consistent with this section, except as provided in this subdivision.(2) (A)  The department may develop capitation rates using a standardized rate methodology across managed care plan models for comparable populations. The specific rate methodology applied to PACE organizations shall address features of PACE that distinguishes it from other managed care plan models.(B) The rate methodology shall be consistent with actuarial rate development principles and shall provide for all reasonable, appropriate, and attainable costs for each PACE organization within a region.(3) The department may develop statewide rates and apply geographic adjustments, using available data sources deemed appropriate by the department. Consistent with actuarial methods, the primary source of data used to develop rates for each PACE organization shall be its Medi-Cal cost and utilization data or other data sources as deemed necessary by the department.(4) Rates developed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the level of care associated with the specific populations served under the contract.(5) The rate methodology developed pursuant to this subdivision shall contain a mechanism to account for the costs of high-cost drugs and treatments.(6) Rates developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be actuarially certified before implementation.(7) (A) Consistent with the requirements under federal law, subsection (b) of Section 460.182 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, capitation rates developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be negotiated between the department and each PACE organization contracting pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591). The department shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the contracting PACE organization on capitation rates.(B)For purposes of this paragraph, the term “negotiated” means that, prior to submission of rates to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for approval, the department shall do all of the following: (i)Respond in writing to any comments made by a contracting PACE organization concerning prospective rates.(ii)Upon request by a contracting PACE organization, provide the rationale for any assumptions or calculations concerning rates including, but not limited to, the actual data and methodologies used to determine the amount that would otherwise be paid (AWOP), experience-based rate range, and capitation payment rate for the PACE organization.(iii)Make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the contracting PACE organization on capitation rates.(B) At least 60 days prior to submitting rates to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for approval, the department shall notify the contracting PACE organization of the proposed rates.(C) The department may define a reasonable date by which the PACE organization shall submit written questions or feedback concerning the proposed rates. The department shall respond in writing to those questions or feedback by no later than 30 days prior to submission to CMS. Upon request by a contracting PACE organization, the department shall provide the rationale for any assumptions or calculations concerning the proposed rates, including, but not limited to, the actual data and methodologies used to determine the amount that would otherwise be paid, the experience-based rate range, and the capitation payment rate for the PACE organization.(8) Consistent with the requirements of federal law, the department shall calculate an upper payment limit for payments to PACE organizations. In calculating the upper payment limit, the department shall correct the applicable data as necessary and shall consider the risk of nursing home placement for the comparable population when estimating the level of care and risk of PACE participants.(9) The department shall pay the entity at a rate within the certified actuarially sound rate range developed with respect to that entity, to the extent consistent with federal requirements and subject to paragraph (11), as necessary to mitigate the impact to the entity of the methodology developed pursuant to this subdivision.(10) During the first two years in which a new PACE organization or existing PACE organization enters a previously unserved area, the department shall pay at a rate within the certified actuarially sound rate range developed with respect to that entity, to the extent consistent with federal requirements and subject to paragraph (11), to reflect the lower enrollment and higher operating costs associated with a new PACE organization relative to a PACE organization with higher enrollment and more experience providing managed care interventions to its beneficiaries.(11) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.(12) This subdivision shall apply for rates implemented no earlier than January 1, 2017.(o) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, as a component of the CalAIM Initiative authorized pursuant to Article 5.51 (commencing with Section 14184.100) of Chapter 7, and any successor waiver, demonstration, or state plan amendment authorizing the Medi-Cal managed care program, the department may establish capitation rates to contracted health plans on a regional basis in lieu of health plan and county-specific rates.(2) Before initially implementing regional-based capitation rates under this subdivision, the department shall report to the Legislature on the process for developing those regional rates and determining the regional groups.(3) The department shall provide a briefing to providers and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, physicians, hospitals, and consumer advocates, that describes the actuarial assumptions and rate methodologies used by the department following submission of rates to the federal government for approval that initially implement regional-based capitation rates under this subdivision. This publicly noticed meeting to providers and other stakeholders shall occur no more than 60 days after submission of the capitation rates to the federal government for approval. The meeting shall be for explanatory purposes and shall not otherwise impact the methodology and data provided to the federal government for approval.(4) The department shall consult with affected contracted health plans in developing the regional groups and rate methodologies, consistent with applicable federal requirements, actuarial methods, and the CalAIM Terms and Conditions as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14184.101 prior to implementing this subdivision. In developing and implementing any methodology pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall seek to incentivize improved quality and outcomes for Medi-Cal managed care enrollees.(5) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals, and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.(p) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that both affected contracted health plans and the state have appropriate actuarial protections against the risk of either significant overpayments or significant underpayments in capitation rates developed and paid pursuant to this section that are associated with the changes to the Medi-Cal managed care program described in Article 5.51 (commencing with Section 14184.100) of Chapter 7, as identified by the department.(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, as a component of the CalAIM initiative authorized pursuant to Article 5.51 (commencing with Section 14184.100) of Chapter 7, and any successor waiver, demonstration, or state plan amendment authorizing the Medi-Cal managed care program, the department may develop and implement appropriate actuarial methods to prevent significant overpayments or significant underpayments as described in paragraph (1), subject to paragraph (4). This may include, but need not be limited to, one or more of the following:(i) A medical or profit and loss risk corridor.(ii) Blended capitation rates based on projected member risk.(iii) Other prospective or retrospective shared savings or risk models.(B) The methods or models described in subparagraph (A) shall seek to encourage quality improvement and promote appropriate utilization incentives, including, but not limited to, reduced rehospitalization and shorter lengths of institutional stay.(3) The department shall consult with affected contracted health plans in implementing this subdivision.(4) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals, and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.